incubator/apertium-snd/apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv">

<!--present indefinte-->
      <e><p><l>يان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>ئ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ئ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--present habitual FIXME -->
<!-- p1-p2-p3 have same forms but distinct auxilliary verbs aahyun-aahyo-aahe -->
      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندِي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نديون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندِي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نديون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندِي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نديون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--past . by me. referring some website-->
      <e><p><l>يس</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ياسين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ئين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئينءَ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!--FIXME : Not added past.hab, past.ind, fut.hab due to ambiguity and doubts : check mehtab's chat on whatsapp -->

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڳالهائ/ڻ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ڻ</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
 -->
      <e><p><l>يندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>يندس</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ينداسين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!--

      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڏس/ڻ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ڻ</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  
      <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>دم</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--  <e><p><l></l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>-->
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ڪرڻ"><i>ڪر</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪرڻ"><i>ڪ</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="اچڻ"><i>آ</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڊﻭڙڻ"><i>ڊﻭڙ</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ملڻ"><i>مل</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="وٺڻ"><i>وٺ</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="وٺڻ"><i>وٺ</i><par n="ڏس/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="لکڻ"><i>لک</i><par n="ڏس/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ٿيڻ"><i>ٿ</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="رهڻ"><i>ره</i><par n="ڪر/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڏسڻ"><i>ڏس</i><par n="ڏس/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳالهائڻ"><i>ڳالهائ</i><par n="ڳالهائ/ڻ__vblex_tv"/></e>
